Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-239
County fair board; budget; requirements.

(1) The budget of each appointed county fair board shall be subject to annual review, audit, and approval by the county board of the county in which such fair board is located.

(2) The budget of each elected county fair board shall be subject to the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 1992, LB 398, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 29;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 17.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.